Utah statutes.
7-9-14.   Meetings.

(1) The annual meeting of the credit union shall be held at such time and place as the bylaws prescribe.

(2)  Special meetings may be held as the bylaws prescribe.

(3)  Notice of all meetings of the credit union shall be given as the bylaws prescribe.

(4)  In the absence of any provisions in the bylaws, special meetings of the members of the credit union may be called by a majority of the members of the corporation.



Enacted by Chapter 16, 1981 General Session

